South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4801.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 5, Title 43 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 43-5-250.  The State of South Carolina opts out of 21 U.S.C. Section 862a, which would make an otherwise eligible individual who has been convicted pursuant to state or federal law of certain drug-related offenses identified in 21 U.S.C. Section 862a(a) ineligible for benefits under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and the Family Independence Program. In so doing, the State of South Carolina exempts any or all individuals domiciled in the State from application of 21 U.S.C. Section 862a. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----